tr: Fren lambası anahtarı konektörü tipi: Yuvarlak terminaller; OEM fişi / pigtail konnektör; Halka terminaller; Vidalı terminaller; Yassı terminaller (dişi); Yassı terminaller (erkek); Sızdırmaz konnektör; Kablo uçları (pigtail); Diğer
zh-TW: 煞車燈開關連接器類型: 子彈型端子; 原廠插頭/引線接頭; 環型端子; 螺絲端子; 扁型端子 (母); 扁型端子 (公); 防水接頭; 導線 (引線); 其他
el: Τύπος ενεργοποίησης διακόπτη φώτων φρένων: Ακροδέκτες bullet; Βύσμα OEM / Σύνδεσμος pigtail; Ακροδέκτες δακτυλίου; Ακροδέκτες με βίδα; Ακροδέκτες τύπου φις (θηλυκοί); Ακροδέκτες τύπου φις (αρσενικοί); Στεγανός σύνδεσμος; Ακροδέκτες καλωδίων (pigtail); Άλλο
sv: Typ av anslutningsknapp för bromsljus: Rundstift; OEM-kontakt / Pigtail-kontakt; Ringkabelskor; Skruvplintar; Flatstift (hona); Flatstift (hane); Vädertätad kontakt; Kabelanslutningar (pigtail); Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de conector do interruptor da luz de freio: Terminais bala; Plugue OEM / conector chicote; Terminais olhal; Terminais de parafuso; Terminais tipo espada (fêmea); Terminais tipo espada (macho); Conector à prova de intempéries; Fios condutores (chicote); Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de conector do interruptor da luz de travão: Terminais cilíndricos; Ficha OEM/conector chicote; Terminais de argola; Terminais de parafuso; Terminais de forquilha (fêmea); Terminais de forquilha (macho); Conector estanque; Fios condutores (chicote); Outro
zh-CN: 刹车灯开关连接器类型: 子弹头端子; OEM 插头/尾纤连接器; 环形端子; 螺纹端子; 铲形端子（母头）; 铲形端子（公头）; 全天候密封连接器; 导线（尾纤）; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta konektora prekidača za svjetlo kočnice: Okrugli priključci; OEM utikač / pigtail priključak; Prstenasti priključci; Vijčani priključci; Plosnati priključci (ženski); Plosnati priključci (muški); Konektor otporan na vremenske uvjete; Žičani izvodi (pigtail); Ostalo
ru: Тип разъема выключателя стоп-сигнала: Цилиндрические клеммы; Оригинальный штекер / разъем с проводами; Кольцевые клеммы; Винтовые клеммы; Ножевые клеммы (гнездо); Ножевые клеммы (штекер); Герметичный разъем; Выводы проводов; Другое
th: ประเภทขั้วต่อสวิตช์ไฟเบรก: ขั้วต่อแบบหัวกระสุน; ปลั๊ก OEM / ขั้วต่อแบบสายพิกเทล; หางปลาแบบกลม; ขั้วต่อแบบขันสกรู; หางปลาแบบแฉก (ตัวเมีย); หางปลาแบบแฉก (ตัวผู้); ขั้วต่อซีลกันสภาพอากาศ; สายไฟ (พิกเทล); อื่นๆ
da: Stiktype for bremselyskontakt: Rundstik; OEM-stik / pigtail-stik; Ringkabelsko; Skrueterminaler; Fladstik (hun); Fladstik (han); Vejrbestandigt stik; Ledninger (pigtail); Andet
ro-RO: Tipul conectorului întrerupătorului luminii de frână: Papuci tip glonț; Mufă OEM / conector pigtail; Papuci inelari; Terminale cu șurub; Papuci tip mamă; Papuci tip tată; Conector etanș la intemperii; Fire de legătură (pigtail); Altele
hu: Féklámpakapcsoló csatlakozási típusa: Golyós csatlakozók; OEM dugó / lengőkábeles csatlakozó; Gyűrűs csatlakozók; Csavaros csatlakozók; Csúszósarus csatlakozók (hüvely); Csúszósarus csatlakozók (dugó); Vízálló csatlakozó; Vezetékvégek (lengőkábel); Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka stikala zavornih luči: Vtični spoji (bullet); Vtič OEM/kabelski priključek (pigtail); Obročni spoji; Vijačni spoji; Ploščati spoji (ženski); Ploščati spoji (moški); Vodotesni priključek; Vodniki z žicami (pigtail); Drugo
nl: Type connector remlichtschakelaar: Kogelstekkers; OEM-stekker / pigtail-connector; Ringkabelschoenen; Schroefklemmen; Schuifstekkers (vrouwelijk); Schuifstekkers (mannelijk); Weerbestendige connector; Draadaansluitingen (pigtail); Overig
ja: ブレーキライトスイッチコネクタータイプ: ギボシ端子; OEMプラグ/ピグテールコネクター; 丸型端子; ネジ式端子; 平型端子 (メス); 平型端子 (オス); 防水コネクター; リード線 (ピグテール); その他
pl: Typ konektora przełącznika świateł hamowania: Złącza cylindryczne; Wtyczka OEM / złącze typu pigtail; Złącza oczkowe; Złącza śrubowe; Złącza płaskie (żeńskie); Złącza płaskie (męskie); Złącze hermetyczne; Przewody doprowadzające (pigtail); Inne
ko: 브레이크등 스위치 커넥터 유형: 총알 단자; OEM 플러그/피그테일 커넥터; 링 단자; 나사형 단자; 스페이드 단자(암); 스페이드 단자(수); 웨더 실 커넥터; 와이어 리드(피그테일); 기타
nb: Koblingstype for bremselysbryter: Rundstiftkontakter; OEM-plugg / pigtail-kontakt; Ringkabelsko; Skrueterminaler; Flatstifthylser (hunn); Flatstifter (hann); Værbestandig kontakt; Ledninger (pigtail); Annet
es: Tipo de conector de interruptores de luces de freno: Terminales tipo bala; Enchufe OEM/conector tipo pigtail; Terminales de anillo; Terminales de tornillo; Terminales de horquilla (hembra); Terminales de horquilla (macho); Conector hermético; Cables (tipo pigtail); Otro
sk-SK: Typ konektora spínača brzdového svetla: Valcové koncovky (kolíkové); OEM zástrčka / pigtail konektor; Očkové koncovky; Skrutkové svorky; Ploché konektory (samička); Ploché konektory (samček); Vodotesný konektor; Káblové vývody (pigtail); Iný
de: Anschlusstyp für Bremslichtschalter: Rundsteckhülsen; OEM-Stecker / Pigtail-Anschluss; Ringkabelschuhe; Schraubklemmen; Flachsteckhülsen (weiblich); Flachstecker (männlich); Wetterfester Stecker; Anschlusskabel (Pigtail); Sonstige
bg-BG: Тип превключвател на спирачните светлини: Цилиндрични клеми; OEM щепсел / конектор тип пигтейл; Кръгли клеми; Винтови клеми; Плоски клеми (женски); Плоски клеми (мъжки); Влагозащитен конектор; Изводи на проводници (пигтейл); Други
lt-LT: Stabdžių žibinto jungiklio jungties tipas: Cilindriniai kontaktai; OEM kištukas / „pigtail“ jungtis; Žiediniai kontaktai; Sraigtiniai kontaktai; Plokštieji kontaktai (lizdiniai); Plokštieji kontaktai (kištukiniai); Izoliuota nuo oro sąlygų jungtis; Laidų išvadai („pigtail“); Kita
it: Tipo di connettore dell'interruttore della luce freno: Terminali a proiettile; Connettore OEM/pigtail; Terminali ad anello; Morsetti a vite; Terminali a forcella (femmina); Terminali a forcella (maschio); Connettore a tenuta stagna; Fili conduttori (pigtail); Altro
fr: Type de connecteur du contacteur de feux stop: Connecteurs à fiches rondes; Fiche OEM/connecteur en queue de cochon; Cosses à anneau; Bornes à vis; Cosses plates (femelle); Cosses plates (mâle); Connecteur étanche; Fils de connexion (queue de cochon); Autre
en: Brake light switch connector type: Bullet terminals; OEM plug / pigtail connector; Ring terminals; Screw terminals; Spade terminals (female); Spade terminals (male); Weather-sealed connector; Wire leads (pigtail); Other
vi: Kiểu giắc cắm công tắc đèn phanh: Cực hình đạn; Phích cắm OEM/đầu nối đuôi lợn; Cực hình vòng; Cực bắt vít; Đầu cốt chữ U (cái); Đầu cốt chữ U (đực); Đầu nối chống thời tiết; Dây dẫn (dạng đuôi lợn); Khác
fi: Jarruvalokatkaisimen liittimen tyyppi: Pyöröliittimet; OEM-pistoke/johtosarja; Rengasliittimet; Ruuviliittimet; Lattaliittimet (naaras); Lattaliittimet (uros); Sääsuojattu liitin; Johdot (pigtail); Muu
cs: Typ konektoru spínače brzdových světel: Kolíkové svorky; OEM zástrčka / pigtail konektor; Očkové svorky; Šroubové svorky; Nožové svorky (dutinky); Nožové svorky (kolíky); Konektor utěsněný proti povětrnostním vlivům; Drátové vývody (pigtail); Jiné